hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		drar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		drear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ducar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		dular
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ebar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ecar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eccionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ecear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		echar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eclinar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ectar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		edar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ediar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		editar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eficiar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		egar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		egrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		einar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ejar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		elar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		elear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		elizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ellar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		emar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		embarcar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		embozar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eminar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		emorizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		empernar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		empotrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		encar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enciar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		encorvar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		endar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		endosar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enfocar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enganchar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		engastar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		engranar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enjaezar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enladrillar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enredar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		enrollar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ensar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		entar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		entear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		entrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eparar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		erar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		erdear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		erear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		erezar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ergar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eriar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		erizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ermanar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		erminar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ernar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		errar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		errear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ersar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ertar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ervar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		esar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		esdoblar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		esionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		esorar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		esposar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		estar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		estear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		estionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		estrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		etar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		etear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		etillar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		etizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		eudar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		evar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ezar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		far
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		fatar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		fear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		fectar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		fiar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ficar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ficiar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		filetear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		firmar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		flamar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		flar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		formar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		frenar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gajar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		garbar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gastar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		genciar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gerar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gitar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gmar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gollar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gorgojar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gotear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gradar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		grafiar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		grar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gregar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gresar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		guazar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		guear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		guetear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		guizgar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gular
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		gularizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		habitar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		hebrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		hechar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		herrumbrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		hilar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		honrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		huchar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		huecar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ializar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iañar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ibar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ibrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		icar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iciar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		icotear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		idar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iderar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ielar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ientar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ietar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ifar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ificar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		igar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ignificar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ijar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ilachar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ilar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ilatar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ilitar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ilizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		illar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		illear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		imantar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		imar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		imbrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		inar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iñar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		inchar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		indar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		indicar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		infectar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ingar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ingresar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		inizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		intar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		intear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		integrar
SFX V		 ar		 ase		isionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ipar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iquear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iquelar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		irar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		irlar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		isar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iscar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		isionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		istar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		italizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		itar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		itear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iterar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		itrificar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		itular
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ivar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		izar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		iznar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jadear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jaezar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jamar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jonar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		jurar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		justar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lacionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ladrillar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ladronear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lamar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lanar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lantar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		larar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		larizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		latar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		latinizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		laustrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lavar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lazar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lcar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ldar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		leccionar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lechugar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		legar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lenar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		letear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		levar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lgar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		liar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		licar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		licitar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lidar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lificar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lillar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		linar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lindar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		literar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		llar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		llenar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lmar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		loar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		logizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lograr
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lomar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lorar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lotar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lpar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lumbrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		lvar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		macollar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		madrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		malizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		manar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		manchar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mangar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		manizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		marcar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		marinar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		matizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mayar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mazar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mbear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mblar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mbrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mbrear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mendar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mentar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		merar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		miar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		minalizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		minar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mistar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mochar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		modelar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		molar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		monar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mondar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		montar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		morar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		motear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mpañar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mpear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mplificar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		mustiar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nagar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nalar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nalizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		naturalizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ncadenar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ncar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nchar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nciar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ndear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nditar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ndizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ndrar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		near
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		negociar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nerar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nervar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ñetear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		netizar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nfatuar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		ngar
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nguear
SFX V		 ar		 aseis		nificar
