hunspell/spanish.dic
abanicar/V
abatojar/V
abocardar/V
abortar/V
abrír/V
absurdir/V
acalabazar/V
acaramelar/V
acebedar/V
achabacanar/V
acidular/V
acogotar/V
acoqueñir/V
acosijar/V
acroitar/V
adañar/V
adestrar/V
adonar/V
aduener/V
afarolar/V
afoscar/V
agenciar/V
agravir/V
aguaitar/V
agusanar/V
ahormar/V
ajedrecer/V
alambicar/V
alburear/V
alegorizar/V
alfizar/V
alicer/V
aljofarar/V
almicantarar/V
alquitrar/V
amacollar/V
amarillecer/V
amerar/V
amochar/V
amorillar/V
ampollar/V
analizar/V
angar/V
anonadar/V
anteveer/V
antiparasitar/V
aovar/V
aparar/V
apedrear/V
apiadar/V
aplaudiar/V
apoquinar/V
aprensar/V
apunear/V
arbitrar/V
areniscar/V
aromatizar/V
arrebolar/V
arrezacer/V
arroer/V
artífizar/V
asear/V
asfaltar/V
asperear/V
asumir/V
atalantar/V
atarquinar/V
aterrar/V
atíncar/V
atrinquir/V
aureguir/V
automatizar/V
avatar/V
avizorasar/V
azoastar/V
baber/V
bajar/V
baldragar/V
banderillear/V
barbotear/V
barretear/V
batanear/V
bebir/V
beodecer/V
betlemitir/V
bienquestir/V
bipostar/V
blandear/V
bocaminar/V
bolichar/V
bornear/V
bragar/V
bribiar/V
bronquir/V
buganviliar/V
buzar/V
cablegrafiar/V
cachondear/V
calender/V
campantar/V
capacitar/V
carbonizar/V
carrizar/V
catasalsar/V
cecidir/V
centenerar/V
cetar/V
chapodar/V
chimpanzar/V
chular/V
cintarear/V
cizanar/V
coadjutoriar/V
cogobernar/V
colorear/V
compartar/V
comprometar/V
concorporear/V
conformar/V
consensuar/V
contextualizar/V
contrahechurar/V
convencerar/V
coquetar/V
correlacionar/V
cotufar/V
cross-countriar/V
cuberter/V
culpar/V
danzar/V
declinar/V
deipar/V
denuestar/V
der/V
desaficionar/V
desamir/V
desapuntalar/V
desater/V
desbrir/V
descastar/V
descolgar/V
desconvenir/V
descr/V
desembrir/V
desencasquillar/V
desenjalmar/V
desertar/V
desgaznatar/V
desigualar/V
deslucir/V
desmigajar/V
desorganizar/V
despegar/V
desplacerar/V
desquijarar/V
destiranizar/V
desvedar/V
detrajir/V
dibromopropañolar/V
dijer/V
discurriar/V
displacer/V
documentar/V
drizar/V
ej.r/V
embaldosar/V
embicir/V
embrir/V
empapelar/V
empingorotar/V
emular/V
encadenar/V
encarpetar/V
enchironar/V
encorar/V
encurnar/V
enfeudar/V
engarcir/V
enguantar/V
enladrillar/V
enmudecer/V
enrollar/V
enseriar/V
enterrar/V
entrelucir/V
entruchacer/V
envesar/V
equivocidar/V
escamotear/V
escofinar/V
esculpistar/V
españolar/V
esprintar/V
estatutar/V
estípitar/V
eterizar/V
exclaustrar/V
expilar/V
extinguerir/V
facilitar/V
farmacotecñer/V
fervorinar/V
firmwarar/V
fluir/V
fotografiar/V
frialdar/V
funcionariar/V
galvanizar/V
gar/V
gesterar/V
génovar/V
granear/V
grunir/V
guayar/V
halacabuir/V
heliesquir/V
hibridir/V
hir/V
hormigonar/V
humildar/V
ilustrar/V
impracticabilidar/V
incivilizar/V
indesear/V
infraorbitar/V
inmergir/V
insinuar/V
interestratificar/V
intravascular/V
involuntar/V
jabonar/V
jicar/V
kenaf/V
álagar/V
laquear/V
lebrar/V
leyendar/V
linchar/V
llenar/V
luchr/V
macronuclear/V
malcarar/V
malvender/V
manolar/V
marinerar/V
maullar/V
memorizar/V
metafar/V
miliar/V
mitrar/V
momificar/V
mordiscar/V
mublar/V
murtillar/V
nauseabundar/V
ninear/V
novarar/V
obliterir/V
oesnoroestar/V
opinar/V
orugar/V
paginar/V
pampanillar/V
paralogizar/V
particularizar/V
patojar/V
pegarrocar/V
peraltar/V
permutar/V
pesquisar/V
pigñorar/V
pirugir/V
planudar/V
podar/V
pompir/V
posar/V
prebendar/V
preelegir/V
premurir/V
prevaler/V
profireír/V
propiciar/V
póstumar/V
punzonar/V
quilatar/V
racionalizar/V
rarificar/V
reagrupar/V
rebrinquir/V
receptar/V
reconer/V
recosiar/V
redhibir/V
refinar/V
regañar/V
reimprimir/V
rellamar/V
remolir/V
repanchigar/V
reprender/V
resegar/V
restañar/V
retomar/V
revacunar/V
rezacer/V
ritmar/V
rondar/V
rumorear/V
saducear/V
salpr/V
santiguar/V
secreter/V
semiobstruir/V
serranillar/V
significanciar/V
sitiar/V
sobreimponer/V
sofocar/V
somormujar/V
subar/V
substituir/V
sufragar/V
suplar/V
tabalear/V
tamborilear/V
tasar/V
tempanar/V
tersar/V
tiramirar/V
tornabodar/V
traillar/V
transmitir/V
trasgredir/V
trastrabillar/V
triangular/V
trizar/V
tular/V
ubiar/V
universalizar/V
vagabundear/V
vehementar/V
verdisecar/V
videoartar/V
vitrificar/V
vulnerar/V
zahondar/V
zozobrar/V
